Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 1. Board of Dental Examiners.

Sec. 08.36.010.
Creation and membership of board; oath; seal.

There is created the Board of Dental Examiners consisting of nine members. Six members shall be licensed dentists who have been engaged in the practice of dentistry in the state for five years immediately preceding appointment, two members shall be dental hygienists licensed under AS 08.32 who have been engaged in the practice of dental hygiene in the state for five years immediately preceding appointment, and one member shall be a public member who does not have a direct financial interest in the health care industry.

When making appointments of dentists and dental hygienists under (a) of this section, the governor may consider licensed dentists who have been nominated by the Alaska Dental Society and licensed dental hygienists who have been nominated by the Alaska State Dental Hygienists’ Association.

Each member shall take an oath of office. The president or secretary elected under AS

08.36.030

may administer oaths. The oath shall be filed and preserved in the department.

The board shall adopt a seal.

History.

(§ 1 art II ch 186 SLA 1955; am § 2 ch 155 SLA 1968; am § 8 ch 102 SLA 1976; am § 12 ch 49 SLA 1980; am § 17 ch 100 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 63 SLA 1987; am § 4 ch 24 SLA 2001; am §§ 18, 19 ch 53 SLA 2012)

Sec. 08.36.020.
Term of office. [Repealed, § 20 ch 80 SLA 1996. For current provisions, see AS 39.05.053.]

Sec. 08.36.025.
Suspension of board members.

A member against whom an accusation has been filed under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) for violation of AS

08.32.160

or AS

08.36.315

is suspended from the board until the decision of the board on the accusation takes effect under AS

44.62.520

.

History.

(§ 14 ch 49 SLA 1980; am § 18 ch 100 SLA 1984; am § 19 ch 94 SLA 1987)

Cross references. —

For removal from office, see AS

08.01.020

.

Sec. 08.36.030.
Election and term of officers.

The board shall elect from among its members

a president who is a licensed dentist or licensed dental hygienist; and

a secretary.

Officers elected under (a) of this section serve for a term not to exceed two years.

History.

(§ 3 art II ch 186 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 121 SLA 1972; am § 20 ch 53 SLA 2012)

Sec. 08.36.040.
Meetings.

The board shall meet at the call of the president at least four times annually and at other times necessary to conduct its business.
In the absence of a call of the president, a majority of the board may call a meeting.

History.

(§ 3 art II ch 186 SLA 1955; am § 19 ch 100 SLA 1984)

Sec. 08.36.050.
Quorum.

A majority of the board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.

History.

(§ 4 art II ch 186 SLA 1955)

Sec. 08.36.060.
Expenses and salary. [Repealed, § 3 ch 59 SLA 1966.]

Sec. 08.36.061.
Reimbursement for expenses.

Board members are entitled to per diem and travel expenses authorized for boards and commissions under AS

39.20.180

.
The department shall reimburse a member for other actual, reasonable expenses incurred in carrying out duties as a board member.

History.

(§ 20 ch 100 SLA 1984)

Sec. 08.36.070.
General powers.

The board shall

provide for the examination of applicants and the credentialing, registration, and licensure of those applicants it finds qualified;

maintain a registry of licensed dentists, licensed dental hygienists, and registered dental assistants who are in good standing;

affiliate with the American Association of Dental Boards and pay annual dues to the association;

hold hearings and order the disciplinary sanction of a person who violates this chapter, AS 08.32, or a regulation of the board;

supply forms for applications, licenses, permits, certificates, registration documents, and other papers and records;

enforce the provisions of this chapter and AS 08.32 and adopt or amend the regulations necessary to make the provisions of this chapter and AS 08.32 effective;

adopt regulations ensuring that renewal of a license, registration, or certificate under this chapter or a license, certificate, or endorsement under AS 08.32 is contingent on proof of continued professional competence; the regulations must require that a licensee receive not less than two hours of education in pain management and opioid use and addiction in the two years preceding an application for renewal of a license, unless the licensee has demonstrated to the satisfaction of the board that the licensee does not currently hold a valid federal Drug Enforcement Administration registration number;

at least annually, cause to be published on the Internet and in a newspaper of general circulation in each major city in the state a summary of disciplinary actions the board has taken during the preceding calendar year;

issue permits or certificates to licensed dentists, licensed dental hygienists, and dental assistants who meet standards determined by the board for specific procedures that require specific education and training;

require that a licensed dentist who has a federal Drug Enforcement Administration registration number register with the controlled substance prescription database under AS

17.30.200(n)

.

The board may

order a licensed dentist or licensed dental hygienist to submit to a reasonable physical or mental examination if the dentist’s or the dental hygienist’s physical or mental capacity to practice safely is at issue;

authorize a designee of the board or the board’s investigator to inspect the practice facilities or patient or professional records of a dentist at reasonable times and in a reasonable manner to monitor compliance with this chapter and with AS 08.32; and

delegate the board’s powers to act, hear, and decide matters as authorized by AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 5 art II ch 186 SLA 1955; am § 6 ch 69 SLA 1970; am §§ 15 — 18 ch 49 SLA 1980; am § 21 ch 100 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 63 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 122 SLA 1992; am § 19 ch 6 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 33 SLA 1998; am § 21 ch 53 SLA 2012; am § 5 ch 25 SLA 2016; am § 2 ch 2 SSSLA 2017)

Revisor's notes. —

Former paragraphs (a)(4)-(13) were renumbered as (a)(3)-(12) in 1998 to reflect the 1998 repeal of former paragraph (a)(3).

Administrative Code. —

For administering of anesthetic agent, see 12 AAC 28, art. 1.

For examinations for dental licensure, see 12 AAC 28, art. 2.

For administration of local anesthetic agents by dental hygienists, see 12 AAC 28, art. 3.

For continuing professional competence requirements, see 12 AAC 28, art. 4.

For dental hygienist examination, see 12 AAC 28, art. 5.

For parenteral sedation, see 12 AAC 28, art. 6.

For professional practices, see 12 AAC 28, art. 7.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 17, 2017, added (a)(10).

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(7), added the language beginning “; the regulations must require” to the end of the paragraph, and made a stylistic change.

Editor’s notes. —

The delayed repeal of paragraph (a)(10) of this section by sec. 52,
ch. 25, SLA 2016, which was to take effect July 1, 2021, was repealed by sec. 47,
ch. 2, SSSLA 2017.

Sec. 08.36.073.
Investigator.

After consulting with the board, the department shall employ a person who is not a member of the board as the investigator for the board. The investigator shall

conduct investigations into alleged violations of this chapter and into alleged violations of regulations and orders of the board;

at the request of the board, conduct investigations based on complaints filed with the department or with the board; and

be directly responsible and accountable to the board, except that only the department has authority to terminate the investigator’s employment and the department shall provide day-to-day and administrative supervision of the investigator.

History.

(§ 22 ch 53 SLA 2012)

Sec. 08.36.075.
Dental radiological equipment.

The board shall establish standards that comply with applicable federal law for the registration, use, and inspection of dental radiological equipment, including standards for record keeping relating to the control panels and the use of the equipment. The board may charge a fee for dental radiological equipment registered under this section.

[Repealed, § 40 ch 53 SLA 2012.]

[Repealed, § 40 ch 53 SLA 2012.]

[Repealed, § 40 ch 53 SLA 2012.]

[Repealed, § 40 ch 53 SLA 2012.]

In this section, “dental radiological equipment” means equipment for use in the practice of dentistry, consisting of a control panel and associated tube heads, if the equipment emits electronic product radiation, as defined in AS

18.60.545

, or uses radionuclides, as defined in AS

18.60.545

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1998; am § 5 ch 24 SLA 2001; am § 3 ch 47 SLA 2005; am §§ 23, 40 ch 53 SLA 2012)

Sec. 08.36.080.
Applicability of Administrative Procedure Act.

The board shall comply with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 2 (ch 2) ch 143 SLA 1959)

Sec. 08.36.090.
Records and reports. [Repealed, § 3 ch 59 SLA 1966.]

Sec. 08.36.091.
Records and reports.

The board shall maintain

a record of its proceedings;

a registry containing the name, office and home addresses, and other information considered necessary by the board of each person licensed as a dentist or dental hygienist or registered as a dental assistant, a registry of the licenses, certificates, registrations, and endorsements revoked by the board, and information on the status of each licensee and each registered dental assistant.

History.

(§ 3 ch 155 SLA 1968; am § 24 ch 53 SLA 2012)